Illinois, session 104th, SB224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/15)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1015)7    Sec. 15. Plans and specifications; demonstration of 8capability; record retention. 9    (a) Owners of public water supplies, their authorized 10representative, or legal custodians, shall submit plans and 11specifications to the Agency and obtain written approval 12before construction of any proposed public water supply 13installations, changes, or additions is started. Plans and 14specifications shall be complete and of sufficient detail to 15show all proposed construction, changes, or additions that may 16affect sanitary quality, mineral quality, or adequacy of the 17public water supply; and, where necessary, said plans and 18specifications shall be accompanied by supplemental data as 19may be required by the Agency to permit a complete review 20thereof. In the case of water main installation projects, all 21water main and appurtenances, including, but not limited to, 22fire hydrants and valves that are under the ownership and 23control of a public water supply and located in a public right   SB0224 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05145 BDA 15174 b1of way or utility access easement, shall be included in the 2Agency's written approval. Design review and permitting of 3water main and fire hydrants is the sole responsibility of the 4Agency and water main and fire hydrants shall be installed in 5accordance with the written Agency permit. Fire hydrants 6connected to a plumbing system shall be installed in 7accordance with the Illinois Plumbing License Law and the 8rules and ordinances issued thereunder. 9    (b) All new public water supplies established after 10October 1, 1999 shall demonstrate technical, financial, and 11managerial capacity as a condition for issuance of a 12construction or operation permit by the Agency or its 13designee. The demonstration shall be consistent with the 14technical, financial, and managerial provisions of the federal 15Safe Drinking Water Act (P.L. 93-523), as now or hereafter 16amended. The Agency is authorized to adopt rules in accordance 17with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to implement 18the purposes of this subsection. Such rules must take into 19account the need for the facility, facility size, 20sophistication of treatment of the water supply, and financial 21requirements needed for operation of the facility.22    (c) Except as otherwise provided under Board rules, owners 23and operators of community water systems must maintain all 24records, reports, and other documents related to the operation 25of the community water system for a minimum of 10 years. 26Documents required to be maintained under this subsection (c)   SB0224 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05145 BDA 15174 b1include, but are not limited to, all billing records and other 2documents related to the purchase of water from other 3community water systems. Documents required to be maintained 4under this subsection (c) must be maintained on the premises 5of the community water system, or at a convenient location 6near its premises, and must be made available to the Agency for 7inspection and copying during normal business hours. 8(Source: P.A. 96-603, eff. 8-24-09.)